Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 2. Powers of Foreign Personal Representatives.

Sec. 13.21.010.
Payment of debts of $2,000 or more and delivery of property worth $2,000 or more without local administration. [Repealed, § 18 ch 56 SLA 1973.]

Sec. 13.21.015.
Payment of debt and delivery of property to domiciliary foreign personal representative without local administration.

At any time after the expiration of 60 days from the death of a nonresident decedent, any person indebted to the estate of the nonresident decedent or having possession or control of personal property, or of an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action, belonging to the estate of the nonresident decedent may pay the debt, and deliver the personal property, or the instrument evidencing the debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action, to the domiciliary foreign personal representative of the nonresident decedent upon being presented with proof of appointment and an affidavit made by or on behalf of the representative stating:

the date of the death of the nonresident decedent;

that no local administration, or application or petition therefor, is pending in this state;

that the domiciliary foreign personal representative is entitled to payment or delivery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 19 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Sec. 13.21.020.
Payment or delivery discharges.

Payment or delivery made in good faith under the provisions of AS

13.21.015

releases the debtor or person having possession of the personal property to the same extent as if payment or delivery had been made to a local personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 20 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Sec. 13.21.025.
Resident creditor notice.

Payment or delivery under AS

13.21.015

may not be made if a resident creditor of the nonresident decedent has notified the debtor of the nonresident decedent or the person having possession of the personal property belonging to the nonresident decedent that the debt should not be paid nor the property delivered to the domiciliary foreign personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.21.030.
Proof of authority; bond.

If no local administration or application or petition therefor is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign personal representative may file with a court in this state in a judicial district in which property belonging to the decedent is located, authenticated copies of appointment and of any official bond that has been given by the foreign personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.21.035.
Powers.

A domiciliary foreign personal representative who has complied with AS

13.21.030

may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local personal representative and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A foreign personal representative who has filed an authenticated copy of his letters of appointment with the local court need only present copies of the domiciliary letters and proof that these were filed with the local court to exercise all of the powers of a domiciliary personal representative. August 14, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 13.21.040.
Power of representatives in transition.

The power of a domiciliary foreign personal representative under AS

13.21.015

—

13.21.035

shall be exercised only if there is no administration or application therefor pending in this state.
An application or petition for local administration of the estate terminates the power of the foreign personal representative to act under AS

13.21.035

but the local court may allow the foreign personal representative to exercise limited powers to preserve the estate.
A person who, before receiving actual notice of a pending local administration, has changed position in reliance upon the powers of a foreign personal representative is not prejudiced by reason of the application or petition for, or grant of, local administration.
The local personal representative is subject to all duties and obligations that have accrued by virtue of the exercise of the powers by the foreign personal representative and may be substituted for the foreign personal representative in any action or proceedings in this state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Sec. 13.21.045.
Ancillary and other local administrations; provisions governing.

In respect to a nonresident decedent, the provisions of AS 13.16 govern

proceedings, if any, in a court of this state for probate of the will, appointment, removal, supervision, and discharge of the local personal representative, and any other order concerning the estate; and

the status, powers, duties, and liabilities of any local personal representative and the rights of claimants, purchasers, distributees, and others in regard to a local administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)